District of Columbia statutes.
15-312

Levy on money and evidences of debt.

When the fieri facias is levied on money belonging to the judgment debtor the marshal may not expose the money to sale, but shall account for it as money collected. Bills or other evidences of debt levied upon shall be sold as other personal property is sold, and the marshal may indorse them to pass title to the purchaser.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 526, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-312.
1973 Ed., § 15-312.